src/pronoun-smn-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Pronouns
! ========

! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

LEXICON Pronoun
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;
! Reciprocal ;
Interrogative ;
! Relative ;
! Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1:mu perspronsg ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Sg2:tu perspronsg ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Sg3:su perspronsg ;
mun+Pron+Pers+Du1:mu persprondu ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Du2:tu persprondu ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Du3:su persprondu ;
mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1:mi perspronpl ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Pl2:ti perspronpl ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Pl3:si perspronpl ;


LEXICON perspronsg
+Nom:n	K ;
+Gen:u	      K ;
+Acc:u	      K ;
+Ill:njin	      K ;
+Loc:st	          K ;
+Loc:ste	      K ;
+Com:'in	          K ;
+Com:uin	      K ;
+Abe:uttáá	      K ;
+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Par:đe	      K ;

LEXICON persprondu
+Nom:oi	K ;
+Gen:nnuu	      K ;
+Acc:nnuu	      K ;
+Ill:nnui	      K ;
+Loc:nnust	      K ;
+Com:nnuin	      K ;
+Com:nnuuin	      K ; !^NG^
+Abe:nnuuttáá      K ;
+Ess:nnun	      K ;
+Par:nnud	      K ;

LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom:j		K ;
+Gen:i	      K ;
+Acc:j	      K ;
+Ill:jjân	      K ;
+Loc:st	      K ;
+Loc:'ste	      K ;
+Com:igui'm	      K ;
+Abe:ittáá	      K ;
+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Par:đe	      K ;



! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
tot+Pron+Dem:	TOT ;
tuot+Pron+Dem:	TUOT ;
tot+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:toos K ;
tuot+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:tuos K ;
!tot+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:tooid K ;

LEXICON TOT
:to	TO-TUO ;
:ta	TA ;

LEXICON TUOT
:tuo	TO-TUO ;
:tye	TYE ;


LEXICON TO-TUO
+Sg+Nom:t	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Acc:m	K ;
+Sg+Com:oin	K ;
+Sg+Com:'in K ;
+Sg+Abe:nttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Ill:'id	K ;
+Pl+Ill:oid	K ;
+Pl+Com:igui'm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON TA
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Sg+Ess:nen	K ;
+Sg+Par:đe	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;

LEXICON TYE
+Sg+Loc:s't	K ;
+Sg+Ess:'nen	K ;
+Sg+Par:'đe	K ;
+Pl+Acc:i'd	K ;
+Pl+Loc:i'n	K ;




! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
# ;

! Interrogative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ;
mii+Pron+Interr:moo	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mo	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:ma	MK-low ;
mii+Pron+Interr:ma	MK-front ;

kii+Pron+Interr:k	MK ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-long ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-short ;
kii+Pron+Interr:kiä	MK-low ;
kii+Pron+Interr:ke	MK-front ;

mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:maid    K ; ! The exceptions
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:mon     K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:mooin   K ;
mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:mooi    K ;
!mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com:mooiguim	 K ; ! already in MK-long
mii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abe:mooittáá	 K ;

kii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:kiäm    K ;
kii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:kest    K ; 
kii+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:kiäs't    K ; 
kii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:kein    K ; 
kii+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:kiäi'n    K ; 

LEXICON MK
+Sg+Nom:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long
+Sg+Ill:s	K ;
+Pl+Ill:'id K ;
+Pl+Com:iguim	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá K ;

LEXICON MK-short
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:nttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON MK-low
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Pl+Acc:i'd	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;

LEXICON MK-front
+Ess:nen	K ;
+Par:đe	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
